src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! NB: through June 2019, J. Wilbur's development work made possible by Deutsche Forschungsgemeinschaft (grant 286335341)

! ============================= !
!! # File containing abbreviations
! ============================= !


!! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation   !!= * **@CODE@**
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-one.

!LEXICON ab   !!= * __@CODE@__  No POS, don't know what pos
!ab-nodot ;
!ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-noun-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
!ab-noun ;
!ab-adj ;

! tr
LEXICON trab-ab-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRAB: ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON trab-ab-adj   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRAB: ab-nodot-adj ;
LEXICON trab-ab-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRAB: ab-nodot-adv ;
LEXICON trab-ab-verb   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRAB: ab-nodot-verb ;
LEXICON trab-ab-num   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRAB: ab-nodot-num ;
LEXICON trab-ab-cc   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRAB: ab-nodot-cc ;


LEXICON itrab-ab-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**
+ITRAB: ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON itrab-ab-adj   !!= * **@CODE@**
+ITRAB: ab-nodot-adj ;
LEXICON itrab-ab-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**
+ITRAB: ab-nodot-adv ;
LEXICON itrab-ab-num   !!= * **@CODE@**
+ITRAB: ab-nodot-num;


! tr
LEXICON trnumab-ab-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRNUMAB: ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON trnumab-ab-adj   !!= * **@CODE@**
+TRNUMAB: ab-nodot-adj ;
!LEXICON trnumab-ab-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+TRNUMAB: ab-nodot-adv ;
!LEXICON trnumab-ab-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+TRNUMAB: ab-nodot-num;


!LEXICON ab-cc   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+CC+ABBR: # ;



LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!= * **@CODE@**   The bulk
!! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.
+N+Attr: # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Nom: # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Acc:%>%:m # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Gen:%>%:n # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Ill:%>%:se # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Ine:%>%:sne # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Ela:%>%:ste # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Com:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+Ess:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+N:%> RHyph ;
!sukk 
!sukk LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__   The bulk
!sukk !! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Attr: # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Nom: # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Acc:%>%:m # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Gen:%>%:n # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:se # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Ine:%>%:sne # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Ela:%>%:ste # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Com:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
!sukk +N+ABBR:%> RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   !!= * **@CODE@**
!+ABBR: # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Attr: # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Nom: # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Acc:%>%:m # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Gen:%>%:n # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:se # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ine:%>%:sne # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ela:%>%:ste # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Com:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR:%> RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+ABBR: # ; ! Adv without case, consider this.

LEXICON ab-nodot-num   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Num+ABBR+Nom: # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR:%> RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-cc   !!= * **@CODE@**
+Adv+CC: # ; ! Adv without case, consider this.


! Adding case suffixes to the abbrs in a tentative manner, to test it
! out. The problem with the original treatment represented by the first,
! outcommented member of the two lexica) is that especially intransiv


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__  A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
! ab-verb ;
! ab-nodot-verb ;
! Not in use
LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!= * **@CODE@**
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt: # ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
! +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt: # ; ! No period.
! Not in use.



! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
!! ## Intransitive abbreviations 
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB   !!= * **@CODE@**
! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.
! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.



Apd trnumab-ab-noun   ; !
Bnr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
Gnr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
ILO-konv:ILO%-konv trnumab-ab-noun ;
Kommunenr trnumab-ab-noun ;
O.nr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
Pb trnumab-ab-noun ; ! Postbox
Postnr trnumab-ab-noun ;
Rt trnumab-ab-noun   ; !
S.nr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
alm trnumab-ab-adj ; !
bnr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
fnr trnumab-ab-noun ;
gnr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
jnr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
kapp trnumab-ab-noun ; !
konv trnumab-ab-noun ;
kr trnumab-ab-noun ; !
nr trnumab-ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht !
s trnumab-ab-noun ; !
tab trnumab-ab-noun ; ! or: Add capital Tab. !
tlf trnumab-ab-noun ; !
vnr trnumab-ab-noun ; !



! =============================================== !
!! ## Transitive abbreviations 
! =============================================== !

LEXICON ITRAB   !!= * **@CODE@**
2p+Use/Circ:2p itrab-ab-noun ; ! !
3-st itrab-ab-noun ;
3p+Use/Circ:3p itrab-ab-noun ; ! !
Kr itrab-ab-noun ; !
Spd itrab-ab-noun ; !
a itrab-ab-noun ; !adjektiiva !
a.-g+Use/Circ:a.-g itrab-ab-noun; !
a./g+Use/Circ:a./g itrab-ab-noun; !
a.D itrab-ab-noun ;
abess:abess itrab-ab-noun ;
abl itrab-ab-noun ;
abstr itrab-ab-adj ;
adess itrab-ab-noun ;
adj itrab-ab-noun ;
adv itrab-ab-noun ;
advl itrab-ab-noun ;
affekt itrab-ab-noun ;
akk itrab-ab-noun ;
akt itrab-ab-adv ;
all itrab-ab-noun ;
am itrab-ab-adv ; !
anat itrab-ab-adj ; !anatomalaš !
at itrab-ab-noun ;
att itrab-ab-noun ;
attr itrab-ab-noun ;
biol itrab-ab-adj ; !
bot itrab-ab-adj ; !
bto itrab-ab-adv ; !
ca itrab-ab-adv ; !
cal itrab-ab-noun ; !
can itrab-ab-noun ;
cc itrab-ab-adv ; !
d.d itrab-ab-adv ; !
dat itrab-ab-noun ;
ded itrab-ab-noun ; !
dept itrab-ab-noun ; !
do itrab-ab-adv ; !
dub itrab-ab-adv ;
dus itrab-ab-adv ;                        !
ess itrab-ab-noun ;
etc itrab-ab-adv ; !
euf itrab-ab-adv ; !
fac itrab-ab-noun ; !
ff itrab-ab-adv ; !
fin itrab-ab-noun ;
fol itrab-ab-adv ; !
fr itrab-ab-noun ; !
gen itrab-ab-noun ;
geogr itrab-ab-adj ; !geografiijas !
geom itrab-ab-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger itrab-ab-noun ;
ggl itrab-ab-noun ; !
gl itrab-ab-noun  ; !
gl.rs itrab-ab-noun ; !
ill itrab-ab-noun ;
imp itrab-ab-noun ;
impers itrab-ab-noun ;
impf itrab-ab-noun ;
imprt itrab-ab-noun ;
ind itrab-ab-noun ;
indekl itrab-ab-noun ;
inf itrab-ab-noun ;
ing itrab-ab-noun ; !
instr itrab-ab-noun ;
interr itrab-ab-adj ;
intr itrab-ab-adj ;
j.i itrab-ab-adv  ;
jed itrab-ab-adv  ; !
js itrab-ab-adv  ; !
jur itrab-ab-adj ; !juridihkalaš !
jv itrab-ab-adv ; !
kan itrab-ab-noun ;
kl itrab-ab-noun ;
kom itrab-ab-noun ;
komp itrab-ab-noun ;
kond itrab-ab-noun ;
konj itrab-ab-noun ;
konkr itrab-ab-adj; !konkrehta
lok itrab-ab-noun ; !lokatiiva
lp itrab-ab-noun ; !laktapartihkkal
m itrab-ab-noun ;
m.fl itrab-ab-adv  ;
mKr itrab-ab-noun   ;
matem itrab-ab-adj ; !matematihkalaš
milj itrab-ab-num ;
miljo itrab-ab-num ;
ml itrab-ab-noun ;
mrd itrab-ab-num ;
nom itrab-ab-noun ;
oKr itrab-ab-adv ;
obj itrab-ab-noun ;
od.prp itrab-ab-noun   ;
op.cit itrab-ab-noun   ;
osd itrab-ab-noun   ;
p.b itrab-ab-noun ;
part itrab-ab-noun ; !partihkkal
partit itrab-ab-noun ; !partitiiva
perf itrab-ab-noun   ;
pf itrab-ab-noun   ;
phil itrab-ab-noun   ;
pl itrab-ab-noun   ;
postp itrab-ab-noun ;
pot itrab-ab-noun ;
pr itrab-ab-adv ;
pred itrab-ab-noun ;
prep itrab-ab-noun ;
pres itrab-ab-noun ;
pret itrab-ab-noun ;
prf itrab-ab-noun   ;
pron itrab-ab-noun ;
prs itrab-ab-noun ;
prv itrab-ab-noun   ;
r itrab-ab-adj ; !
refl itrab-ab-adj ;
rel itrab-ab-noun ;
relat itrab-ab-adj ; !relatiiva
res itrab-ab-noun   ;
s.v itrab-ab-adv ;
sek itrab-ab-noun ;
sl itrab-ab-adv ;
spd itrab-ab-noun ;
subj itrab-ab-noun ;
sup itrab-ab-noun ;
tan itrab-ab-noun ; !tangeansa
trans itrab-ab-noun ;
u.b itrab-ab-noun ; !
LEXICON TRAB   !!= * **@CODE@**
Avd.dir trab-ab-noun   ; !Advelingsdirektør
Chr trab-ab-noun   ; !Christian
Edv trab-ab-noun ; !Edvard
H.M trab-ab-noun   ; !Hans/hennes majestet
Jak trab-ab-noun ;
Johs trab-ab-noun ; !Johannes
Luk trab-ab-noun ; !Lukas
Mrs trab-ab-noun ; !
Od.prop trab-ab-noun ; !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
Od.prp.nr trab-ab-noun ; !
Ot.prop trab-ab-noun ; !
Ot.prp trab-ab-noun ; !
Oth trab-ab-noun ; !
Oth.prp trab-ab-noun ; !
Seb trab-ab-noun ; !Sebastian, Sebedeus
St.meld trab-ab-noun ; !
St.nr trab-ab-noun ; !
St.prp.nr trab-ab-noun ; !Stortingsproposisjon nummer
al trab-ab-noun ;
anár trab-ab-adj ; !anársámegiella
art trab-ab-noun ; !artihkkal, artium
avd trab-ab-noun ; !
bbl trab-ab-noun ; !Bargobirašláhka
biht trab-ab-noun ; !
bs trab-ab-verb ;
bv trab-ab-noun ;
cand.mag trab-ab-noun ; !
cand.philol trab-ab-noun ; !
cand.scient trab-ab-noun ; !
d.l trab-ab-noun ; !
dipl.ins trab-ab-noun ; !
dr trab-ab-noun ; !doktor
dr.med trab-ab-noun ; !
dr.theol trab-ab-noun ; !
fax trab-ab-noun ;
fig trab-ab-noun   ; !
genr trab-ab-noun ; !
germ trab-ab-adj   ; !
gl.res trab-ab-noun ;
h.r.adv trab-ab-noun   ; !
i.s trab-ab-adv ;
inkl trab-ab-adj ; !
isl trab-ab-noun   ; !
kapt trab-ab-noun ; !
kat trab-ab-noun ;
korp trab-ab-noun ; !
korr trab-ab-noun ;
lab trab-ab-noun ;
lekt trab-ab-noun ; !
lnr trab-ab-noun   ; !
ltn trab-ab-noun ; !
mag trab-ab-noun   ; !
med trab-ab-noun ;
milj trab-ab-num ; !
miner trab-ab-noun ;
mr trab-ab-noun   ; !
ms trab-ab-noun   ; !
neg trab-ab-noun ;
obl trab-ab-adj   ; !
oblt trab-ab-noun   ; !
odont trab-ab-noun ; !
op trab-ab-noun ;
ordf trab-ab-noun ; !ordførar
pa trab-ab-noun ;
part.prf trab-ab-noun ;
ped trab-ab-noun   ; !padagoga, pedagogihkka, pedagogalaš
pharm trab-ab-adj ; !
philol trab-ab-noun   ; !
pm trab-ab-noun ;
pol trab-ab-adj ; !
polit trab-ab-adj ; !
post trab-ab-noun ;
priv trab-ab-adj ; !
pro trab-ab-noun ; !
prp trab-ab-noun   ; !
psyk trab-ab-adj ; !
red trab-ab-noun ; !
resipr trab-ab-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
sic trab-ab-noun ;
stud trab-ab-noun ; !
su trab-ab-adv ; ! sullii
sugr trab-ab-adj ; !suoma-ugralaš
tlg trab-ab-noun ;
vs trab-ab-cc ; !
A+Use/-Spell:A trab-ab-noun ; !
E+Use/-Spell:E trab-ab-noun ; !
J+Use/-Spell:J trab-ab-noun ; !
N+Use/-Spell:N trab-ab-noun ; !
R+Use/-Spell:R trab-ab-noun ; !
V+Use/-Spell:V trab-ab-noun ; !
Z+Use/-Spell:Z trab-ab-noun ; !
Ä+Use/-Spell:Ä trab-ab-noun ; !
Ž+Use/-Spell:Ž trab-ab-noun ;
Á+Use/-Spell:Á trab-ab-noun ;
đ+Use/-Spell:đ trab-ab-noun ;
c+Use/-Spell:c trab-ab-noun ; !
g+Use/-Spell:g trab-ab-noun ; !
k+Use/-Spell:k trab-ab-noun ; !
p+Use/-Spell:p trab-ab-noun ; !
t+Use/-Spell:t trab-ab-noun ; !
x+Use/-Spell:x trab-ab-noun ; !
ø+Use/-Spell:ø trab-ab-noun ; !
č+Use/-Spell:č trab-ab-noun ; !
